Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-293
Notices; recording.

The register of deeds of each county shall accept all such notices which describe real estate located within the county which he serves and shall enter and record such notices in full among miscellaneous instruments and index the same.

Laws 1947, c. 243, § 6, p. 764.